Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.020

Appointment of personnel.

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the chief of the Washington state patrol, determine his compensation, and may remove him at will.

The chief shall appoint a sufficient number of competent persons to act as Washington state patrol officers, may remove them for cause, as provided in this chapter, and shall make promotional appointments, determine their compensation, and define their rank and duties, as hereinafter provided. Before a person may be appointed to act as a Washington state patrol officer, the person shall meet the minimum standards for employment with the Washington state patrol, including successful completion of a psychological examination and polygraph examination or similar assessment procedure administered by the chief or his or her designee in accordance with the requirements of RCW 43.101.095(2).

The chief may appoint employees of the Washington state patrol to serve as special deputies, with such restricted police authority as the chief shall designate as being necessary and consistent with their assignment to duty. Such appointment and conferral of authority shall not qualify said employees for membership in the Washington state patrol retirement system, nor shall it grant tenure of office as a regular officer of the Washington state patrol.

The chief may personally appoint, with the consent of the state treasurer, employees of the office of the state treasurer who are qualified under the standards of the criminal justice training commission, or who have comparable training and experience, to serve as special deputies. The law enforcement powers of any special deputies appointed in the office of the state treasurer shall be designated by the chief and shall be restricted to those powers necessary to provide for statewide security of the holdings or property of or under the custody of the office of the state treasurer. These appointments may be revoked by the chief at any time and shall be revoked upon the written request of the state treasurer or by operation of law upon termination of the special deputy's employment with the office of the state treasurer or thirty days after the chief who made the appointment leaves office. The chief shall be civilly immune for the acts of such special deputies. Such appointment and conferral of authority shall not qualify such employees for membership in the Washington state patrol retirement system, nor shall it grant tenure of office as a regular officer of the Washington state patrol.

[ 2005 c 434 s 4; 1983 c 144 s 1; 1981 c 338 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 80 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.020. Prior: 1949 c 192 s 1; 1933 c 25 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6362-61.]

NOTES:

Civil service exemptions: RCW 41.06.070.